Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-722 Who can sue third parties for
injury to goods. Where a third party so deals with goods which have been
identified to a contract for sale as to cause actionable injury to a party to
that contract:

(a) A right of action against the third party is in
either party to the contract for sale who has title to or a security interest
or a special property or an insurable interest in the goods; and if the goods
have been destroyed or converted a right of action is also in the party who
either bore the risk of loss under the contract for sale or has since the
injury assumed that risk as against the other;

(b) If at the time of the injury the party plaintiff
did not bear the risk of loss as against the other party to the contract for
sale and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the recovery,
his suit or settlement is, subject to his own interest, as a fiduciary for the
other party to the contract;

(c) Either party may with the consent of the other
sue for the benefit of whom it may concern. [L 1965, c 208, §2-722; HRS
§490:2-722]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next